Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) On or before  January 1, 2028, the Land Conservation and Development
Commission shall adopt rules that  incorporate guidance for nonstructural, nature-based
solutions for shoreline stabilization in estuaries,  coastal shorelands and the ocean shore by,
at a minimum:
(a) Adopting a definition of “nonstructural, nature-based solutions.” The definition:
(A) Must include natural materials that are dynamic  and absorb wave energy and are
meant to mimic natural systems, including but not limited to native organisms, such as
shellfish, trees and plants, and locally sourced logs, rocks, sand, clay and woody debris.
(B) May not include structural methods of shoreline stabilization  that are static and re-
flect wave energy.
(C) Must include criteria for habitat for wildlife, improving water quality,  cultural and
recreational resources and, where appropriate, public access.
(D) Must be separate and distinct from existing rules and definitions for  shoreline sta-
bilization in estuaries, coastal shorelands and the ocean shore that include jetties, bulkheads,
seawalls, riprap, beachfront protective structures and other similar protective structures.
(b) Providing guidance for the use  of nonstructural, nature-based solutions to minimize
harmful impacts from flooding, and erosion, including through provisions for monitoring,
maintenance and reconstruction.
(c) Requiring that nonstructural, nature-based solutions conform  with statewide land use
planning goals and that nonstructural, nature-based solutions and  ecologically focused land
use management practices are prioritized over  structural solutions in addressing problems
of erosion and flooding.
(2) In adopting rules under this section, the commission:
(a) Shall confer with the Department of State Lands, the  Department of Transportation
and the State Parks and Recreation Department;
(b) Shall appoint an advisory committee under ORS 183.333 that must include members
who are coastal engineering professionals, restoration professionals,  representatives of en-
vironmental and recreational organizations, tribal representatives,  land owners or managers,
fish and wildlife professionals and local government officials; and
(c) May  not substantively amend any process established by rule that allows the De-
partment of Transportation to perform actions or undertake projects that use shoreline
stabilization that includes structural methods, elements or solutions.
Enrolled Senate Bill 504 (SB 504-B) Page 1
SECTION 2. On or before January 1, 2029, the Department of State  Lands and the State
Parks and Recreation Department may adopt rules conforming or consistent with  the rules
adopted by the Land Conservation and Development Commission  under section 1 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $268,488, to develop rules related to
nature-based shoreline stabilization methods.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 504 (SB 504-B) Page 2